apertium-hye-eng.hye.dix
    <pardef n="մ/ուխ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>խից</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խի</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խին</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խում</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խով</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուխ</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուխը</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուխն</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խերից</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խերի</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խերին</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խերում</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խերով</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խեր</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խերը</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>խերն</l><r>ուխ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ուղ/իղ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>ղից</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղի</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղին</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղում</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղով</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղ</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղը</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղն</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղներից</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղների</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղներին</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղներում</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղներով</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղներ</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղները</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իղներն</l><r>իղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="վ/իզ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>զից</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զի</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զին</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զում</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զով</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իզ</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իզը</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իզն</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զերից</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զերի</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զերին</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զերում</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զերով</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զեր</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զերը</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>զերն</l><r>իզ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="բժ/իշկ__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>շկից</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շկի</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շկին</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շկով</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկ</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկը</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկն</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկներից</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկների</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկներին</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկներով</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկներ</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկները</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշկներն</l><r>իշկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="տավիղ"><i>տավ</i><par n="ուղ/իղ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ուղիղ"><i>ուղ</i><par n="ուղ/իղ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="բժիշկ"><i>բժ</i><par n="բժ/իշկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ծուխ"><i>ծ</i><par n="մ/ուխ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="մուխ"><i>մ</i><par n="մ/ուխ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="շառավիղ"><i>շառավ</i><par n="ուղ/իղ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="վիզ"><i>վ</i><par n="վ/իզ__n_nn"/></e>
